California statutes. Elections Code
All meetings of the committee shall be held in quarters which shall be accessible to persons with disabilities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General [7880. - 7884.]

7880.

A committee shall have charge of the party campaign under general direction of the state central committee or of the executive committee selected by the state central committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7881.

A committee may make rules and regulations providing for the following:

(a) How officers of the committee may be removed.

(b) How meetings may be called, and any provisions so made shall supersede anything in this chapter to the contrary.

(c) Whether or not proxies may be used and the conditions under which they may be used.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7882.

The committees shall perform other duties and services for this political party as seem to be for the benefit of the party. They shall continue to function and exist until the members of the new committees take office after the succeeding presidential primary election or pursuant to Section 7784.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 507, Sec. 33.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7883.

If the chairperson of a committee refuses to call a meeting, a meeting may be called upon five days’ notice by a majority of the members of the committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7884.

Within five days after a committee meets for its organizational meeting, the newly elected chairperson of the committee shall notify the county elections official of his or her name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 199, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. Green Party [7900. - 7928.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [7900. - 7900.]

7900.

This part applies to the organization, operations, and functions of the party known as the Green Party. As used in this part, “Green Party” means the Green Party of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Members of County Councils [7901. - 7910.]

7901.

At each presidential preference primary election, members of central committees, which shall be termed “county councils,” shall be elected in each county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 108.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7902.

For purposes of this chapter, the registration figures used shall be those taken from the statement of voters and their political preferences transmitted by the elections officials to the Secretary of State on or before March 1 of the odd-numbered year preceding the next presidential preference primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 109.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7903.

The number of members of the county council to be elected in a county shall be a minimum of three and a maximum of 50, and the process in which each county’s number shall be calculated shall be defined in the Green Party’s bylaws and, to be effective, shall be communicated to the Secretary of State by the Green Party Liaison to the Secretary of State no later than 175 days before the next presidential preference primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 110.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7904.

At its first meeting following the presidential preference primary election and at subsequent meetings, a county council may appoint additional members to the county council to fill any vacancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 111.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7905.

A person shall not be appointed to membership on a county council who is registered as preferring another party or registered as “No Party Preference.” Appointment of other persons who cannot register to vote shall be allowed under certain circumstances as described in state Green Party bylaws and any applicable county Green Party bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7906.

The removal of residence by an elected or appointed member of a county council from the applicable county shall constitute automatic resignation from the county council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7907.

A member of a county council who changes her or his voter registration to no longer prefer the Green Party shall automatically be removed from office upon such registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7908.

County council members additionally may be removed for cause by procedures established in the Green Party’s bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7909.

When a person is appointed to a county council, the county council shall file notices of the appointment with the county elections official and the coordinating committee of the Green Party within 30 days after the appointment is made. The notices shall contain the name and address of the person appointed and shall indicate the date of the appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7910.

The Department of General Services shall permit any county council that desires to do so to hold meetings in a state building within the county, and a minimum of one meeting each month shall be without charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Election of County Councils [7911. - 7923.]

7911.

Members of county councils shall be elected from one or more multimember districts. Multimember districts shall conform to the county boundaries or recognized jurisdictional boundaries of Congressional, State Assembly, State Senate, or Supervisorial districts within that county, in accordance with state Green Party bylaws and county Green Party bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 112.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7912.

The Secretary of State, no later than the 175th day before the presidential preference primary election, shall compute the number of members of a county council to be elected in each county and shall mail a certificate to that effect to the elections official of each county and to the Green Party Liaison to the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 113.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7913.

The elections official, no later than the 172nd day before the presidential preference primary election, shall compute the number of members of a county council to be elected in each district if the election of the members is to be by district pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 114.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7914.

In each county, the name of each candidate for member of a county council shall appear on the ballot only if she or he is registered as preferring the Green Party and has filed a nomination paper pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6850) of Part 1 of Division 6, signed on the candidate’s behalf by Green Party voters of the county council election district in which she or he is a candidate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7915.

In counties where members of county councils are to be elected by district, a person seeking election as a member of a county council may seek election only in the district in which she or he resides.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7916.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a person may obtain and circulate nomination papers for both nomination to a public office and for election as a member of a county council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7917.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the number of sponsors that shall be required of a person to be a candidate for member of a county council shall be either not less than 20 sponsors, or not less than 2 percent of the number of voters registered as preferring the Green Party in the county council election district, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7918.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, each sponsor is entitled to sponsor as many candidates as there are seats in the county council election district. Candidate names listed on a single sponsor’s certificate, and the signatures on the certificate shall count toward the sponsor requirement of each and every candidate whose name is listed on the certificate. The number of candidates having their names on a sponsor’s certificate shall not exceed the number of members of a county council to be elected in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 115.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7919.

The elections official of each county shall include the office of member of county council and the candidates for the office in a place and manner similar to that for the office of county central committee of other political parties and the candidates for that office on the applicable official lists.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7920.

The order of appearance of the names of the candidates for member of county council on the ballot shall be determined by a public drawing held at the time, place, and manner prescribed for determining the order of names of county central committee members pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7921.

The office of member of county council shall be placed on the presidential preference primary ballot under the heading “Party County Council” in the place and manner designated for the office of county central committee pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13. The subheading printed under party central committees on the presidential preference primary ballot shall be in substantially the following form: Member of Green Party County Council, ___the __________ District or Member of the Green Party County Council, _______ County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 116.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7922.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the votes cast for each candidate for member of county council shall be included in the canvass and statement of results in a manner similar to the vote for each candidate for county central committees pursuant to Division 15 (commencing with Section 15000), and specifically:

(a) The final total of votes cast for each candidate for member of county council, including the name, address, and ballot designation of each candidate, and a specification as to which candidates were declared elected shall be certified to the Secretary of State without delay upon completion of the official canvass. The county clerk shall simultaneously send one copy of this final certification to the Green Party Liaison to the Secretary of State.

(b) As soon as practicable after the presidential preference primary election, the Secretary of State shall prepare a certified list, by county, of all elected Green Party members of county councils, including their addresses and primary election ballot designations. The Secretary of State shall send copies of the list to the registrar of voters in each county no later than 45 days following the presidential preference primary election. This list shall be maintained for public inspection by the registrars of voters in each county until a subsequent list is received.

(c) The Secretary of State, no later than 45 days following the presidential preference primary election, shall send a notice by mail to each of the elected members of county councils that informs the person that she or he has been elected as a member of the county council. The Secretary of State shall send a copy of the
 certified list of all elected members of all county councils to the Green Party Liaison to the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 117.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7923.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a write-in candidate for member of county council shall not be declared elected unless the write-in candidate has received a number of votes equal to or greater than 2 percent of the number of party members voting in the county council election district at the presidential primary or 20 votes, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. State Coordinating Committee [7924. - 7928.]

7924.

The members of the state coordinating committee shall be elected as provided in the Green Party bylaws and shall have the responsibilities described in those bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7925.

A person shall not be a member of the state coordinating committee unless she or he is registered as a voter preferring the Green Party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7926.

The state coordinating committee shall hold meetings at least once during each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7927.

(a) The state coordinating committee shall have the authority to certify, as provided by Green Party bylaws, county council members in the following counties:

(1) Counties where no county council candidates qualified for the ballot in the preceding presidential preference primary election.

(2) Counties where all members of the county council have become disqualified from holding office.

(b) County council members certified pursuant to this section shall meet the qualifications otherwise required for county council members. County council members certified pursuant to this section shall be reported by the state coordinating committee to the
 applicable county elections officials. County council members certified under this section shall have all the powers and privileges otherwise afforded to county councils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 118.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7928.

The state coordinating committee shall communicate in writing to the Secretary of State the identity of the Green Party Liaison to the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 8. NOMINATIONS [8000. - 8903.]



PART 1. PRIMARY ELECTION NOMINATIONS [8000. - 8228.]



  CHAPTER 1. Direct Primary [8000. - 8150.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [8000. - 8005.]

8000.

This chapter does not apply to:

(a) Recall elections.

(b) Presidential primary.

(c) Nomination of officers of cities or counties whose charters provide a system for nominating candidates for those offices.

(d) Nomination of officers for any district not formed for municipal purposes.

(e) Nomination of officers for general law cities.

(f) Nomination of school district officers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8001.

(a) A declaration of candidacy for membership on a county central committee shall not be filed by a candidate unless (1) at the time of presentation of the declaration and continuously for not less than three months immediately prior to that time, or for as long as the candidate has been eligible to register to vote in the state, the candidate is shown by the candidate’s affidavit of registration to have expressed a preference for the political party of that committee, and (2) the candidate has not been registered with a preference for a qualified political party other than that political party
 within 12 months.

(b) The elections official shall attach a certificate to the declaration of candidacy showing the date on which the candidate registered with a preference for the political party of that committee, and indicating that the candidate has not been
 registered with a preference for any other qualified political party for the period specified in subdivision (a) immediately preceding the filing of the declaration. This section does not apply to a declaration of candidacy filed by a candidate of a political party participating in its first direct primary election subsequent to its qualification as a political party pursuant to Section 5100.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a county central committee, subject to the bylaws of the state central committee, may establish the length of time that a candidate for membership on that committee must be shown by the candidate’s affidavit of registration to have expressed a preference for the political party of that committee, and may establish the length of time that a candidate for membership on that committee must not
 have been registered with a preference for a qualified political party other than the political party of that
 committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 106, Sec. 2.   (AB 3370)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8002.

If a candidate is a candidate for a nonpartisan office, all reference to party affiliation shall be omitted on all forms required to be filed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8002.5.

(a) A candidate for a voter-nominated office shall indicate one of the following upon their declaration of candidacy, which shall be consistent with what appears on the candidate’s most recent affidavit of registration:

(1) “Party Preference: ______ (insert the name of the qualified political party as disclosed upon your affidavit of registration).”

(2) “Party Preference: None (if you have declined to disclose a preference for a qualified political party upon your affidavit of registration).”

(b) The selection made by a candidate pursuant to subdivision (a) shall appear on the primary and general election ballot in conjunction with the candidate’s name, and shall not be changed between the primary and general election.

(c) Regardless of the party preference, or lack of party preference, of the candidate or the voter, any qualified voter may vote for any candidate for a voter-nominated office if the voter is otherwise entitled to vote for candidates for the office to be filled. Nothing in Section 2151,
 13102, or 13502 shall be construed to limit the ability of a voter to cast a primary election ballot for any candidate for a voter-nominated office, regardless of the party preference, or lack of party preference, designated by the candidate for inclusion upon the ballot pursuant to this section, provided that the voter is otherwise qualified to cast a ballot for the office at issue.

(d) A candidate designating a party preference pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be deemed to be the official nominee of the party designated as preferred by the candidate. A candidate’s designation of party preference shall not be construed as an endorsement of that candidate by the party designated. The party preference designated by the candidate is shown for the information of the voters only and may in no way limit the options available to voters.

(e) All references to party preference or affiliation shall be omitted from all forms required to be filed by a voter-nominated candidate pursuant to this division in the same manner that such references are omitted from forms required to be filed by nonpartisan candidates pursuant to Section 8002, except that the declaration of candidacy required by Section 8040 shall include space for the candidate to list the party preference disclosed upon the candidate’s most recent affidavit of registration, in accordance with subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 24.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8003.

(a) (1) A person shall not file nomination papers for more than one office at the same primary election.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “office” does not include the position of member of a political party’s county central committee.

(b) If a person has filed nomination papers for an office at a primary election and those nomination papers have not been withdrawn pursuant to Section 8020.5, the elections official shall reject as invalid any nomination papers that the person attempts to file for another office at the same primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 355, Sec. 3.   (AB 1784)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8004.

(a) In the event that no candidate files for a party’s nomination for any partisan office that would appear on the ballot in a county or a political subdivision within that county, the elections official shall do both of the following:

(1) Refrain from printing a partisan ballot for that party in that county or a political subdivision within that county in which there are no candidates for that political party’s nomination.

(2) Send notification to those voters registered as affiliated with that party that there were no qualified candidates for the partisan office for which the voter is eligible to vote, together with a nonpartisan ballot, unless, within 10 days after the final date for filing nomination papers for the office, a petition indicating that a write-in campaign will be conducted is filed with the elections official and signed by 10 percent of the registered voters, or 100 registered voters, whichever is less, affiliated with that party within the county or a political subdivision within that county, whichever is applicable.

(b) A separate petition shall be filed for each specific office for which a write-in campaign is to be conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 289, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8005.

In addition to satisfying the requirements of Sections 9083.5, 9084.5, and 14105.1, the Secretary of State shall conduct public voter education campaigns, using existing resources, for the purpose of publicly disseminating information regarding the roles of the parties in primary elections for party-nominated offices, voter-nominated offices, and nonpartisan offices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 1, Sec. 18.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Nomination Documents [8020. - 8028.]

8020.

(a) A candidate’s name shall not be printed on the ballot to be used at the direct primary unless the following nomination documents are delivered for filing to the county elections official:

(1) Declaration of candidacy pursuant to Section 8040.

(2) Nomination papers signed by signers pursuant to Section 8041.

(3) Proper qualification documentation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13.5, if applicable.

(b) The forms shall first be available on the 113th day prior to the direct primary election,
 or on the 158th day prior to the primary election for a candidate for membership on a county central committee, and shall be delivered to the county for which the nomination documents were circulated not later than 5 p.m. on the 88th day prior to the primary election. The forms may be delivered to the county elections official by a person other than the candidate.

(c) Upon the receipt of an executed nomination document, the county elections official shall give the person delivering the document a receipt, properly dated, indicating that the document was delivered to the county elections official.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 8028, upon request of a candidate, the county elections official shall provide the candidate with a declaration of candidacy. The county elections official shall not
 require a candidate to sign, file, or sign and file, a declaration of candidacy as a condition of receiving nomination papers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 669, Sec. 2.   (AB 910)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8020.5.

(a) A candidate may withdraw nomination documents for any office other than a statewide office that the candidate delivered for filing to the county elections official by delivering a statement of withdrawal to the county elections official. The statement may be delivered to the county elections official by a person other than the candidate. If the statement is not executed by the candidate in the office of the elections official, the candidate shall execute the statement before a notary public appointed by the Secretary of State or other state official. The statement
 shall be signed by the candidate under penalty of perjury, and shall include all of the following:

(1) Identification of the office for which the candidate previously delivered nomination documents for filing to the county elections official.

(2) A statement that the candidate irrevocably withdraws those nomination documents.

(3) A statement that the candidate understands that by withdrawing the nomination documents, the candidate will not appear on the ballot as a candidate for that office.

(4) A statement that the candidate understands that they will not receive a refund of any filing fees
 that the candidate paid in connection with the candidacy for that office pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8105 of the Elections Code.

(b) A candidate shall have until 5 p.m. on the 88th day before the primary election to withdraw nomination documents, except that if the extended period for filing nomination documents specified in Section 8022 or Section 8024 applies for a particular office, a candidate shall have until 5 p.m. on the 83rd day before the primary election to withdraw nomination documents for that office.

(c) A candidate who withdraws nomination documents pursuant to this section may, during the applicable filing period, file nomination documents for any other office at the same primary election for which the person is eligible to be a candidate, except
 the office for which the person withdrew their nomination documents. This subdivision shall not be construed to extend any deadline for filing nomination documents.

(d) If a candidate withdraws their nomination documents and does not subsequently qualify as a candidate for another office at the same primary election, the candidate’s name shall not appear on the ballot for any office at that election.

(e) If a candidate delivers a statement of withdrawal to a county elections official pursuant to this section, and the office to which the statement applies is one for which nomination documents are required to be filed in the office of the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8100, the county elections official shall do all of the following:

(1) Immediately upon receipt, electronically send a copy of the statement to the Secretary of State.

(2) If the office to which the statement applies is to be voted on in more than one county, immediately upon receipt electronically send a copy of the statement to the elections official in each other affected county.

(3) Within five days of receipt of the statement, forward the original statement to the Secretary of State.

(f) For purposes of this section, “statewide office” means the office of Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Controller, Insurance Commissioner, Secretary of State, Superintendent
 of Public Instruction, Treasurer, or Member of the United States Senate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 355, Sec. 4.   (AB 1784)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8021.

All nomination documents which are delivered for filing to the elections official in compliance with Section 8020 and that are not required by this chapter to be filed in the office of the Secretary of State shall be filed with the elections official by the 83rd day before the primary election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8022.

Notwithstanding Section 8020 or any other provision of the law, if nomination documents for an incumbent state Senator, Member of the Assembly, state constitutional officer, Insurance Commissioner, Member of the United States House of Representatives, or United States Senator are not delivered by 5 p.m. on the 88th day before the direct primary election, or are delivered but then are withdrawn before 5 p.m. on the 88th day before the direct primary election, any person other than the person who was the incumbent on the 88th day shall have until 5 p.m. on the 83rd day before the election to file nomination documents for the elective office.

However, if the incumbent’s failure to file
 nomination documents is because the incumbent has already served the maximum number of terms permitted by the California Constitution for that office, there shall be no extension of the period for filing the nomination documents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 355, Sec. 5.   (AB 1784)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8023.

(a) Except in the case of a judicial office filled in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 16 of Article VI of the Constitution, every candidate for a judicial office, not more than 14 nor less than five days prior to the first day on which his or her nomination papers may be circulated and signed or may be presented for filing, shall file in the office of the elections official in which his or her nomination papers are required to be filed, a written and signed declaration of his or her intention to become a candidate for that office on a form to be supplied by the elections official. A candidate for a numerically designated judicial office shall state in his or her declaration for which office he or she intends to become a candidate.

(b) No person may be a candidate nor have his or her name printed on any ballot as a candidate for judicial office unless he or she has filed the declaration of intention provided for in this section. If the incumbent of a judicial office fails to file a declaration of intention by the end of the period specified in subdivision (a), persons other than the incumbent may file declarations of intention no later than the first day for filing nomination papers.

(c) Declarations shall be in substantially the following form:

“I hereby declare my intention to become a candidate for the office of____(name of office and district, if any) at the ____, 2____ election.”

No candidate for a judicial office shall be required to state his or her residential address on the declaration of intention. However, if the address is not stated on the declaration of intention, the address must be provided to the elections official for verification.

(d) This section shall apply to all judicial offices whether numerically designated or not.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 199, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8024.

Notwithstanding Section 8020 or any other provision of the law, if nomination documents for an incumbent officer of a county are not delivered by 5 p.m. on the 88th day before the direct primary election, or are delivered but then are withdrawn before 5 p.m. on the 88th day before the direct primary election, any person other than the person who was the incumbent on the 88th day shall have until 5 p.m. on the 83rd day before the election to file nomination documents for the elective office.

This section is not applicable where there is no incumbent eligible to be elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 355, Sec. 6.   (AB 1784)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8025.

If a candidate who has declared a candidacy for a nomination at the direct primary election for a voter-nominated office dies after the last day prescribed for the delivery of nomination documents to the elections official, as provided in Section 8020, but not less than 83 days before the election, any person, regardless of his or her party preference or lack of party preference, may circulate and deliver nomination documents for the office to the elections official up to 5 p.m. on the 74th day prior to the election. In that case, the elections official shall, immediately after receipt of those nomination documents, certify and transmit them to the Secretary of State in the manner specified in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 13.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8026.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except for an election for a judicial office, an election shall not be conducted and no votes cast for the office shall be counted, and if counted the votes shall be null and void, if an incumbent is a candidate for a nonpartisan statewide, countywide, or citywide office, or for a nonpartisan office that is elected by division, area, or district, which he or she currently holds at an election at which only one other candidate, excluding any write-in candidates, has qualified to have his or her name placed on the ballot for that office, and either the challenger or the incumbent dies after the hour of 12:01 a.m. of the 68th day before the election.

(b) A special election shall be called and held when the death of the challenger or the incumbent occurs within the period set in subdivision (a). The special election shall be called by the appropriate governing body within 14 days after the death of the incumbent or challenger. The special election shall be held no later than 88 days after the proclamation or resolution calling for the election. Candidates at the special election shall be nominated in accordance with this part, except that forms for securing signatures in lieu of a filing fee need not be made available until 15 days before the first day for circulating nomination papers, in-lieu-filing-fee petitions shall be filed at least seven days prior to the closing of the nomination period, nomination papers shall be delivered for filing to the elections official not less than 68 days and not more than 87 days before the special election, any candidate’s statement shall be filed with the clerk no later than the 68th day before the special election, and the Secretary of State shall conduct the randomized alphabet drawing under procedures similar to Sections 13112 and 13113 on the 67th day before the special election. Any candidate who paid a filing fee in connection with the previously scheduled election shall not be required to pay any additional filing fee, but shall be required to file new nomination papers.

(c) The Secretary of State or elections official shall take appropriate action to ensure that voters do not erroneously vote in a canceled election.

(d) This section applies to a primary election. If a candidate in a runoff election dies under the circumstances prescribed in subdivision (a), Section 15402 applies to govern the results of that election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8027.

(a) Filing of nomination papers for a nonpartisan office, except for a judicial office, shall be reopened when an incumbent who is a candidate for a nonpartisan statewide, countywide, or citywide office, or for a nonpartisan office that is elected by division, area, or district which he or she currently holds at an election at which only one other candidate, excluding any write-in candidates, has qualified to have his or her name placed on the ballot for that office and either the challenger or the incumbent dies after the 88th day but before the 68th day before the election.

(b) Any person qualified to be a candidate for the office for which either the deceased challenger or the deceased incumbent was a candidate may circulate and deliver nomination papers commencing the day after the death of either the challenger or the incumbent. Candidates shall be nominated in accordance with this part, except that in-lieu-filing-fee petitions shall not be made available and nomination papers shall be returned to the elections official no later than 5 p.m. on the 68th day before the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8028.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a candidate shall not remove a declaration of candidacy form from the office of the elections official, and the elections official shall require all candidates filing a declaration of candidacy to execute the declaration in the office of the elections official.

(b) A candidate may, in a written statement signed and dated by the candidate, designate a person to receive a declaration of candidacy form from the elections official and deliver it to the candidate. The statement shall include language indicating that the candidate is aware that the declaration of candidacy must be properly executed and delivered to the elections official of the county of the candidate’s residence by the 88th day prior to the direct primary election. That statement shall be retained by the elections official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Form of Nomination Documents [8040. - 8042.]

8040.
